Hawaii statutes.
§11-24 Closing register. (a) At 4:30
p.m. on the thirtieth day prior to each primary, special primary, or special
election, but if the day is a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday then at 4:30 p.m. on
the first working day immediately thereafter, the general county register shall
be closed to registration for persons seeking to vote at the primary, special
primary, or special election and remain closed to registration until after the
election, subject to change only as provided in sections 11-21(c), 11-22, 11-25,
11-26, and this section.

(b) Notwithstanding the closing of the
register for registration to vote at the primary or special primary election,
the register shall remain open for the registration of persons seeking to vote
at the general or special general election, until 4:30 p.m. on the thirtieth
day prior to the general or special general election, but if the day is a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday then at 4:30 p.m. on the first working day
immediately thereafter, at the end of which period the general county register
shall be closed to registration and remain closed until after the general or
special general election next following, subject to change only as provided in
sections 11-21(c), 11-22, 11-25, and 11-26. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973,
c 217, §1(1); am L 1976, c 106, §1(6); am L 1977, c 189, §1(3); am L 1979, c
139, §3; am L 1990, c 156, §7; am L 1992, c 129, §5; am L 2012, c 225, §4]

Note

The 2012 amendment applies to all primary, special,
nonpartisan, and general elections, beginning with the primary election of
2016. L 2012, c 225, §9.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next